Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 4

Legislative Audit

Subchapter 1

— State Audits

10-4-101 — 10-4-119. [Repealed.]

10-4-201 — 10-4-219. [Repealed.]

For school financial audits, the financial statements shall be presented on a fund basis format with, as a minimum, the general fund and the special revenue fund presented separately and all other funds included in the audit presented in the aggregate.

As an alternative to the presentation prescribed in subsection (c) of this section, the governing body of a school may require its annual financial audit to be performed and financial statements presented in accordance with the guidelines prescribed by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board, the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants, and the Government Accountability Office, if applicable.

Subchapter 3

— Arkansas Governmental Compliance Act

10-4-301. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Arkansas Governmental Compliance Act”.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 111, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-710; Acts 1989, No. 47, § 1.

10-4-302. Definition.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires, “public servant” means:

Any officer or employee of this state or of any political subdivision thereof;

Any person exercising the functions of any such officer or employee;

Any person acting as an advisor, consultant, or otherwise in performing any governmental function, but not including witnesses; or

Any person elected, appointed, or otherwise designated to become a public servant, although not yet occupying that position.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 111, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-710.

10-4-303. Penalty.

Any public servant who does not comply with the provisions of this subchapter and the laws listed in §10-4-304 commits the offense of noncompliance with the first offense being a Class C misdemeanor, the second offense a Class B misdemeanor, and the third offense a Class A misdemeanor. This penalty provision does not repeal any other penalty provision provided by the laws included in §10-4-304.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 111, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-717.

Cross References. Fines for misdemeanors, §5-4-201 et seq.

Imprisonment for misdemeanors, §5-4-401 et seq.

10-4-304. Laws within purview of subchapter.

The fiscal management laws coming within the purview of this subchapter are as follows:

Sections 14-25-101 — 14-25-114, and 14-25-115 [repealed];

Sections 14-22-101 — 14-22-115;

Section 14-16-105(b)-(e);

Section 26-39-201;

Section 26-35-1001 [repealed];

Section 26-28-111(a);

The County Government Code, § 14-14-101 et seq.;

Sections 14-59-101 — 14-59-116;

Sections 16-10-201 — 16-10-210;

Section 22-9-203(a) and (b);

Section 16-92-110 [repealed];

Sections 26-79-104(b) and 27-70-207(c);

Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 13 [repealed];

Sections 14-237-101 — 14-237-113;

Sections 6-13-618, 6-17-910 [repealed], 6-17-912, 6-17-913, 6-17-918, and 6-17-919;

Sections 19-1-401 — 19-1-405;

Sections 19-4-101 — 19-4-2004;

Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 11;

Sections 21-4-201 — 21-4-213;

Sections 21-1-103 and 21-5-101 — 21-5-104;

Sections 21-5-201 — 21-5-218;

Sections 6-20-101 [repealed], 6-20-102 — 6-20-1515; and

Sections 6-21-101 — 6-21-608.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The bond provisions of §§6-13-618 and6-17-918, referred to in this section, may be affected by §21-2-201 et seq., regarding a blanket bond program for school district officers and employees, or by §21-2-701 et seq., regarding blanket performance bond coverage for all public employees.

Section19-1-403, referred to in this section, may be affected by the blanket bond provisions of §21-2-401 et seq., for county officers and employees, §21-2-301 et seq. [repealed], for municipal officers and employees, §21-2-201 et seq. [repealed], for school district officers and employees, or the blanket performance bond coverage provisions of §21-2-701 et seq., for all public employees. See those sections and notes thereto.

Publisher's Notes. Pursuant to Ark. Const. Amend. 62, § 11, the provisions of Ark. Const. Amend. 13, referred to in this section, are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with the provisions of Ark. Const. Amend. 62.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “27-70-207(c)” for “27-70-207(b)” in (12).

The 2015 amendment substituted “Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 11” for “Sections 19-11-201 – 19-11-259” in (18).

History.

Acts 1979, No. 111, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-711; Acts 1989, No. 47, § 2; 2011, No. 752, § 2; 2015, No. 557, § 1.

10-4-305. Notice of deficiencies.

The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall establish the following procedure for giving written notice to a public servant of deficiencies in the operation or performance of the public servant's official duties as provided by the laws of the State of Arkansas in the fiscal management of the public servant's duties.

The cochairs of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall give notice by certified letter to the public servant with a provision for response to the letter thirty (30) days from the date of the receipt of the letter by the public servant.

The letter shall contain a summary of the audit findings of noncompliance denoted in the audit report prepared by the staff of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee on the operations of the public servant's office, duties, and responsibilities as provided by the laws named in § 10-4-304.

The notice shall offer the assistance of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee to the public servant on actions necessary to effect compliance with the laws named in § 10-4-304.

The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee may require a municipal official who is responsible for any deficiencies under subsection (a) of this section to attend relevant training courses provided by the Arkansas Municipal League, Arkansas Legislative Audit, or other appropriate training program.

Reimbursement for the training is authorized for expenses at the rate authorized for state employees and for mileage at the rate established in the state travel rules for state employees while traveling within the state in the performance of their official duties.

Reimbursement for the training is subject to specific appropriation for that purpose.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 554, § 1, provided: “Division of Legislative Audit renamed ‘Arkansas Legislative Audit’.

“(a)(1)The Division of Legislative Audit, as it is referred to or empowered throughout the Arkansas Code, is renamed.

“(2)In its place, Arkansas Legislative Audit is established, succeeding to the general powers and responsibilities previously assigned to the Division of Legislative Audit.

“(3)The Legislative Auditor shall identify and revise all interagency documents, financial instruments, funds, and other necessary legal documents in order to effect this change.

“(b)This act does not impair the powers and authority of the Division of Legislative Audit before the effective date of this act.

“(c)Appropriations authorized for the personal services and operating expenses of the Division of Legislative Audit may be utilized for the personal services and operating expenses of Arkansas Legislative Audit.

“(d)This act does not impair the continued effectiveness of rules or orders promulgated or issued by the Division of Legislative Audit before the effective date of this act.

“(e)The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make all changes inthe Arkansas Code necessary to effectuate the intent of this act.”

Amendments. The 2011 amendment, in (a), deleted “the purpose of” preceding “giving” and substituted “the public servant's” for “their”; substituted “The Cochairs of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall give notice by certified letter to the public servant” for “Notice to the public servant shall be given by certified letter from the cochairs of the Committee” in (b)(1); inserted “Legislative Joint Auditing” in (b)(2) and (3); deleted “of the State of Arkansas” at the end of (b)(2); and added (c).

The 2015 amendment substituted “Arkansas Legislative Audit” for “the Division of Legislative Audit” in (c)(1).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c)(2)(A).

After the public servant takes the necessary action for compliance with fiscal management laws of the State of Arkansas, he or she shall request the staff of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee to review his or her corrective actions and to determine whether he or she is now in compliance with the above-named laws of the State of Arkansas.

If it is determined that he or she is in compliance, then this public servant should denote his or her compliance by signing a verified affidavit which contains a summary of the areas where deficiencies in the fiscal management of his or her responsibilities and duties were noted and all corrective actions that were taken or will be taken to effect compliance.

If the public servant fails to obtain compliance as to the laws contained in § 10-4-304 or to respond within the time limit contained in § 10-4-305, then the public servant shall be invited or subpoenaed to appear before the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee to show cause why the public servant has not complied with the above-named fiscal management laws of the State of Arkansas.

(1)If the public servant is invited and the public servant fails to respond to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee's invitation provided above, then a second invitation shall be issued by the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee in the form of a legal notice published in the newspaper serving the respective county of the public servant. The legal notice of invitation shall be published at least one (1) time each week for three (3) consecutive weeks prior to the date of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee meeting to which the public servant has been invited.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 111, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-711; Acts 2011, No. 611, § 1; 2015, No. 554, § 6; 2019, No. 315, § 750.

10-4-306. Compliance with fiscal management laws — Review — Affidavit.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 111, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-712.

10-4-307. Invitation to appear.

The legal notice shall be in the following form:

“State of Arkansas
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee COUNTY OF
STATE OF ARKANSAS INVITATION THE People of the State of Arkansas TO
GREETING: You are invited to appear in Room
, State Capitol Building, Little Rock, Arkansas, before the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee on the
day of
, 20 , at
, and discuss with the Committee your respective audit report, prepared by the staff of the Committee, and if there is any additional evidence you would like to produce at this meeting, that is now in your custody or the custody of some other individual, you are requested to furnish the Committee's staff with this information at least seven (7) days prior to the date of your appearance. Witness my hand, as
and the seal thereof, on this
day of
, 20 . Legislative Joint Auditing Committee”

Click to view form.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 111, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-713.

10-4-308. Grace period.

After the public servant has appeared before the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, as provided by §10-4-307, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee may allow a maximum period of thirty (30) days from the date of his or her appearance before the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee for the public servant to effect compliance.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 111, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-714.

10-4-309. Enforcement by prosecuting attorney.

In such cases when compliance has not been obtained by the public servant within the above-given time periods, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall notify the respective prosecuting attorney of each public servant and the prosecuting attorney shall conduct an investigation into the transactions coming within the fiscal management laws contained in § 10-4-304 as to the public servant's compliance with the laws as they related to the public servant's functions within a state agency, institution, department, board, commission, bureau, or within a county, municipality, or school district.

The prosecuting attorney shall report back to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee within forty-five (45) days from the date of the matter's being referred to him or her by the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

The prosecuting attorney commits the offense of noncompliance if after being duly advised of the given facts of a situation that relate to a charge of noncompliance against another public servant he or she fails or omits to perform the duty of conducting an investigation required of him or her by this section.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2011, No. 850, § 5, provided:

“FUNDS. In the event the Division of Legislative Audit of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee should receive any funds in connection with performing their duties as prescribed by the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery Act, such funds shall be deposited into the State Central Services Fund to be utilized solely by the Division of Legislative Audit of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee in performing such duties.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2011 through June 30, 2012.”

Acts 2012, No. 198, § 5, provided: “FUNDS.

In the event the Division of Legislative Audit of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee should receive any funds in connection with performing their duties as prescribed by the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery Act, such funds shall be deposited into the State Central Services Fund to be utilized solely by the Division of Legislative Audit of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee in performing such duties.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2012 through June 30, 2013.”

Acts 2015, No. 554, § 1, provided: “Division of Legislative Audit renamed ‘Arkansas Legislative Audit’.

“(a)(1)The Division of Legislative Audit, as it is referred to or empowered throughout the Arkansas Code, is renamed.

“(2)In its place, Arkansas Legislative Audit is established, succeeding to the general powers and responsibilities previously assigned to the Division of Legislative Audit.

“(3)The Legislative Auditor shall identify and revise all interagency documents, financial instruments, funds, and other necessary legal documents in order to effect this change.

“(b)This act does not impair the powers and authority of the Division of Legislative Audit before the effective date of this act.

“(c)Appropriations authorized for the personal services and operating expenses of the Division of Legislative Audit may be utilized for the personal services and operating expenses of Arkansas Legislative Audit.

“(d)This act does not impair the continued effectiveness of rules or orders promulgated or issued by the Division of Legislative Audit before the effective date of this act.

“(e)The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make all changes inthe Arkansas Code necessary to effectuate the intent of this act.”

Acts 2017, No. 736, § 5, provided:

“FUNDS. In the event Arkansas Legislative Audit of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee should receive any funds in connection with performing their duties as prescribed by the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery Act, such funds shall be deposited into the State Central Services Fund to be utilized solely by Arkansas Legislative Audit of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee in performing such duties.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2017 through June 30, 2018.”

Acts 2018, No. 166, § 5, provided:

“FUNDS. In the event Arkansas Legislative Audit of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee should receive any funds in connection with performing their duties as prescribed by the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery Act, such funds shall be deposited into the State Central Services Fund to be utilized solely by Arkansas Legislative Audit of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee in performing such duties.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2018 through June 30, 2019.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 12: Apr. 13, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and the Division of Legislative Audit provide essential auditing and investigative services to the General Assembly and the State of Arkansas; that to avoid confusion, the General Assembly finds it is necessary to combine the Arkansas Code provisions concerning the Division of Legislative Audit and the local audit section of the division in one Arkansas Code chapter; that to avoid certain undue hardships on public entities of the state, it is also necessary for the General Assembly to provide a basis of financial statement presentation for certain public entities; that the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants' Statement on Auditing Standards Number 99 regarding the detection of fraud requires auditors to document unsubstantiated allegations of fraud in their working papers; and that this act is immediately necessary because the General Assembly finds that the public disclosure of such unsubstantiated allegations do not serve a public purpose and may cause irreparable harm to innocent individuals and public employees. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 993, § 18: Apr. 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is the state’s constitutional obligation to provide a general, suitable, and efficient free system of public schools in the state; that the public school funding distribution changes in this act are needed to ensure that proper funding is provided to the affected public charter schools; and that this act is immediately necessary so that the affected public charter schools will receive the amount of funding provided under this act for the current school year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 736, § 9: Mar. 29, 2017, §6. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2017 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, with the exception that Section 6 in this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval, and that in the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2017, with the exception that Section 6 in this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval, could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2017, with the exception that Section 6 in this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Am. Jur. 72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, § 65.

Ark. L. Rev.

The Executive Branch — Fusing the Division of Authority, 24 Ark. L. Rev. 182.

C.J.S. 81A C.J.S., States, § 134.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Arkansas Legislative Audit” for “Division of Legislative Audit” in the section heading; substituted “an agency known as ‘Arkansas Legislative Audit’” for “a Division of Legislative Audit” at the end of (a); and substituted “Arkansas Legislative Audit” for “The division” at the beginning of (b).

Cross References. Comprehensive financial management system for counties, §14-21-101.

“Audit” means a financial audit, performance audit, information technology audit, review, report of agreed-upon procedures, compilation, examination, investigation, or other report or procedure approved by the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee for an entity of the state or a political subdivision of the state;

“Entity of the state” means the State of Arkansas as a whole or any department, institution of higher education, board, commission, agency, quasi-public organization, official, office, or employee, or any agency, instrumentality, or function thereof;

“Financial audit” means a systematic examination of the financial statements of an entity and the related supporting evidence for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the fairness with which they present, in all material respects, financial position, results of operations, and its cash flows in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States, another comprehensive basis of accounting, or a regulatory basis, as applicable;

“Other funds” means any funds or assets held by a person, foundation, nonprofit corporation, or any other entity for the specific benefit of a particular entity or entities of the state or political subdivision of the state;

“Political subdivision of the state” means any county, municipality, school, quasi-public organization, district, official, office, or employee, or any agency, instrumentality, or function thereof;

“Public funds” means any funds, moneys, receivables, grants, investments, instruments, real or personal property, or other assets, liabilities, equities, revenues, receipts, or disbursements belonging to, held by, or passed through an entity of the state or a political subdivision of the state; and

“School” means any public school district, charter school, or education service cooperative, or any publicly supported entity having supervision over public educational entities.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment substituted “education service cooperative” for “educational cooperative” in (a)(7).

The 2015 amendment deleted “of presentation” following “regulatory basis” in (a)(3).

All records, documents, correspondence, or other data of a person, foundation, nonprofit corporation, or any other entity holding other funds that would infringe upon the rights, privacy, or confidentiality of donors of private funds to the person, foundation, nonprofit corporation, or other entity are exempt from public disclosure when in the possession of the Legislative Auditor.

Any working papers or other data relating to the donor information examined by the Legislative Auditor under this chapter are confidential and exempt from public disclosure.

The Legislative Auditor may conduct any audit or investigation that in his or her judgment is proper and necessary to carry out the purpose and intent of this subchapter or to assist the General Assembly in the proper discharge of its duties.

In conducting audits of entities of the state or political subdivisions of the state, the Legislative Auditor shall have access at all times to and have the authority to examine any record or documentation relating to transactions with these entities, regardless of the nature, custodian, or location of those records.

However, in the investigation of documents, books, and records regarding receipt, expenditure, or disbursement of other funds, the Legislative Auditor must determine, subject to approval of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee or its executive committee, that the investigation of the documents, books, and records is necessary to verify any audit of an entity of the state or a political subdivision of the state or to investigate misappropriation of other funds.

The Legislative Auditor has the authority to require the aid and assistance of all officials, auditors, accountants, and other employees of each entity of the state or political subdivision of the state at all times in the inspection, examination, and audit of any books, accounts, transactions, financial statements, or any other pertinent records.

In conducting audits of entities of the state or political subdivisions of the state or verifying transactions with the entities of the state or political subdivision of the state, and in the investigation of other funds, the Legislative Auditor has the authority to summon and issue subpoenas for the appearance of individuals or the production of documents or other records.

The Legislative Auditor may make specific recommendations to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and the General Assembly for the amendment of existing laws or the passage of new laws designed to improve the functioning of entities of the state and political subdivisions of the state to the end that more efficient service may be rendered and the cost of government reduced.

The Legislative Auditor shall not include in his or her recommendations to the General Assembly any recommendations as to the sources from which taxes shall be raised to meet the governmental expense.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment redesignated former (b)(2) as (b)(2)(A), (B), and (C); rewrote the former first sentence of (b)(2) as present (b)(2)(A); and added “when in the possession of the Legislative Auditor” at the end of (b)(2)(B).

Unless upon the presentation his or her selection is rejected, he or she shall in all respects continue to carry out the functions, powers, and duties as Legislative Auditor.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “session or fiscal” following “regular” in (b)(1); and substituted “regular session or fiscal session of the General Assembly” for “regular legislative session” in (b)(2)(A).

When a vacancy in the position of Legislative Auditor exists, the position shall be filled by the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee by majority action of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee membership, subject to approval of both houses of the General Assembly at its next regular session.

The Legislative Auditor may be removed for cause at any time by a majority vote of the membership of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee after a public hearing.

The cochairs of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, upon vote or approval of the majority of the membership of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, shall execute a written appointment of the person employed as the Legislative Auditor and cause the written appointment to be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

Upon appointment, the Legislative Auditor shall qualify by taking the constitutional oath.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 111, §§ 6, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-715, 4-716; Acts 1989, No. 47, § 3.

Subchapter 4

— Arkansas Legislative Audit

10-4-401. Arkansas Legislative Audit — Creation.

There is created under the authority of the General Assembly an agency known as “Arkansas Legislative Audit”.

Arkansas Legislative Audit shall be headed by the Legislative Auditor, who shall be selected by the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7; 2015, No. 554, § 7.

10-4-402. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

The definitions in this subchapter are limited to this subchapter only, and shall not be used or interpreted as applying to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7; 2007, No. 617, § 37; 2015, No. 554, § 8.

10-4-403. Authority of Legislative Auditor.

The Legislative Auditor has the authority to perform an audit of any entity of the state, political subdivision of the state, or transaction relating to public funds and to prepare a written report of the audit to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and to the entity being audited.

(1)In addition, the Legislative Auditor has the authority to investigate documents, books, and records regarding receipt, expenditure, or disbursement of other funds if the Legislative Auditor determines, subject to approval of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee or its executive committee, that the investigation of the documents, books, and records is necessary to verify any audit of an entity of the state or a political subdivision of the state or to investigate misappropriation of other funds.

(A)This section does not authorize or permit the Legislative Auditor to release information:

When otherwise prohibited by law; or

Not subject to public inspection under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq., or other applicable law.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7; 2015, No. 554, § 9.

10-4-404. Qualifications of Legislative Auditor.

The Legislative Auditor shall be a licensed certified public accountant in the State of Arkansas with at least seven (7) years of government auditing experience prior to being appointed.

At the time of appointment, the Legislative Auditor shall not be related in the second degree of consanguinity or affinity to any member of the General Assembly or a constitutional officer.

The Legislative Auditor shall not serve in any ex officio capacity on any administrative board or commission or have any financial interest in the transactions of any entity of the state or political subdivision of the state, other than those financial interests that accrue as a result of being an employee of the state.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7.

10-4-405. Employment and removal of Legislative Auditor.

The Legislative Auditor shall be employed by a majority vote of the membership of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, and the name of the person selected shall be presented to each house of the General Assembly for confirmation by both houses if the General Assembly is in session at the time of the selection.

(1)If the Legislative Auditor is selected while the General Assembly is not in session, he or she shall in all respects carry out the functions, powers, and duties as provided in this subchapter until the next regular session or fiscal session of the General Assembly.

(A)During the next regular session or fiscal session of the General Assembly, the name of the person selected as Legislative Auditor shall be presented to both houses of the General Assembly for confirmation.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7; 2009, No. 962, § 27.

10-4-406. Written appointment and oath of Legislative Auditor.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7.

10-4-407. Duties of Legislative Auditor.

The Legislative Auditor shall:

Personally, or through the Legislative Auditor's authorized assistants and employees, conduct audits of any entity of the state or political subdivision of the state now in existence or hereafter created;

Make recommendations to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and respective entities regarding the:

Improvement of the accounting systems used by any entity of the state or political subdivision of the state; or

Proper installation and utilization of the accounting system;

Call attention to any funds which, in his or her opinion, have not been expended in accordance with the law, appropriation, ordinance, rule, or other legal requirement and shall make recommendations to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, the General Assembly, and other applicable governing bodies as to the manner or form of appropriations which will avoid any improper expenditure of money in the future;

Report to the proper authorities apparent improper or illegal practices contained in audit reports;

Provide technical assistance in establishing uniform systems of recordkeeping within the entities of the state and political subdivisions of the state insofar as it is practical to do so and not inconsistent with law or professional standards; and

Require, on forms prescribed or made available, the filing with Arkansas Legislative Audit of financial reports at such times as the Legislative Auditor deems advisable.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Arkansas Legislative Audit” for “the Division of Legislative Audit” in (6).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (3).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7; 2015, No. 554, § 10; 2019, No. 315, § 751.